District of Columbia statutes.
49-209

Surveying officer to be appointed upon death or desertion of accounting officer.

In the event of the death or desertion of any officer accountable for public property the Commanding General shall direct that a surveying officer be appointed, and also designate an officer to receive such property. Said surveying officer shall ascertain and verify all public property which the deceased or deserting officer had on hand at the time of his death or desertion and certify the same to the officer designated to receive it, who will immediately take up all property so certified and receipt for the same to the heads of the proper staff departments. The surveying officer will then proceed to determine and fix the responsibility for the loss or destruction of any of the foregoing property which is not found or transferred as directed.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 37

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-209.
1973 Ed., § 39-509.